Kentucky statutes. TITLE IV Judicial Branch
CHAPTER 27 Master Commissioners and Receivers [Repealed]

27.010.
Master commissioner for circuit court — Appointment — Term — Bond. [Repealed.]

27.020.
Commissioner in courts having two judges — Appointment. [Repealed.]

27.025.
Master commissioner for circuit courts of continuous session in counties having less than 150,000 population. [Repealed.]

27.030.
Receiver — When commissioner to act as — Appointment — Oath and bond. [Repealed.]

27.035.
Appointment of receiver for mortgaged property. [Repealed.]

27.040.
Commissioner and receiver in Jefferson County. [Repealed.]

27.050.
Special commissioner. [Repealed.]

27.060.
Receiver or commissioner may be selected by parties. [Repealed.]

27.061.
Appointment of receiver — Appeal from order appointing or refusing to appoint. [Repealed.]

27.062.
Persons not to be appointed receivers. [Repealed.]

27.063.
Oath and bond of receiver. [Repealed.]

27.064.
Powers of receiver. [Repealed.]

27.070.
Vacancy in vacation — How filled. [Repealed.]

27.080.
Deputies. [Repealed.]

27.085.
Secretary to master commissioner in certain counties containing city of second class — Transcript of proceedings. [Repealed.]

27.090.
May use proof of, and perform duties of, predecessor. [Repealed.]

27.100.
Powers and duties of commissioner. [Repealed.]

27.110.
Docket, to keep — Entries may be used to prove claim. [Repealed.]

27.120.
Receiver’s office hours — Vacation. [Repealed.]

27.130.
Report of collections. [Repealed.]

27.140.
Depository court may select bank as. [Repealed.]

27.150.
Money received, custody, accounting and disbursement of. [Repealed.]

27.160.
Reports on deposits. [Repealed.]

27.170.
Interest on deposits applied to costs. [Repealed.]

27.180.
Loan of money deposited in court. [Repealed.]